Maryland, session 2025, HB0850.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
(a) There is a Workgroup on the Creation of a Data Dashboard for Public Work
Contracts and Apprentices.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) three members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President
of the Senate;
(2) three members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the Secretary of Labor, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Commissioner of Labor and Industry, or the Commissioner’s
designee; and
(5) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) one representative of the Baltimore–DC Building Trades
Council, selected by the President of the Council;
(ii) one representative of the Mid–Atlantic Pipe Trades Association;
and
(iii) one representative who is an attorney and a member of
Steamfitters Union Local 602;
(iv) one representative of the Associated Builders and Contractors of
Maryland (ABC);

HOUSE BILL 850 3
(v) one representative of the Independent Electrical Contractors
(IEC) Chesapeake; and
(vi) one representative of the Maryland Minority Contractors
Association (MMCA).
(c) The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House shall designate the
co–chairs of the Workgroup.
(d) The Commissioner of Labor and Industry shall provide staff for the
Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) At the first meeting of the Workgroup that occurs on or after July 1, 2025, the
Workgroup shall vote to adopt a code of conduct providing for the acceptable conduct of
Workgroup members.
(g) The Workgroup shall:
(1) study the most efficient and cost–effective method to create a publicly
available data dashboard that disaggregates information regarding public work contracts
with the State, including information on:
(i) the name of each contractor and subcontractor working under a
public work contract;
(ii) wages, including overtime wages, and benefits paid to each
employee of a contractor or subcontractor working under a public work contract;
(iii) the job classification of each employee employed by a contractor
or subcontractor working under a public work contract;
(iv) apprentices working under each contractor and subcontractor for
public works contracts, including:
1. the number of apprentices employed;
2. demographic information for each apprentice;

HOUSE BILL 850
3. the date each apprentice registered with the Maryland
Department of Labor;
4. the trade practiced by each apprentice; and
5. the certification status of each apprentice; and
(v) each apprenticeship program sponsored by each contractor or
subcontractor working under a public work contract; and
(2) make recommendations regarding:
(i) where the data dashboard shall be located;
(ii) necessary costs associated with the development and
maintenance of the data dashboard; and
(iii) time frames during which the data dashboard can be developed
and implemented and the frequency with which the information in the data dashboard can
be updated.
(h) On or before January 7, 2027, the Workgroup shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
17–206.
(A) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL DEVELOP A CLEAR AND
EASY–TO–UNDERSTAND GRAPHIC DATA DASHBOARD THAT INCLUDES, FOR EACH
ONGOING PUBLIC WORK CONTRACT:
(1) THE NAME OF EACH CONTRACTOR AND SUBCONTRACTOR
WORKING UNDER THE PUBLIC WORK CONTRACT;
(2) THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION REGARDING THE EMPLOYEES OF
EACH CONTRACTOR AND SUBCONTRACTOR WORKING UNDER THE PUBLIC WORK
CONTRACT:
(I) THE PREVAILING WAGE RATES PAID BY EACH CONTRACTOR
OR SUBCONTRACTOR;
(II) THE NUMBER OF EMPLOYEES EMPLOYED BY EACH
CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR;

HOUSE BILL 850 5
(III) THE REGULAR WAGES AND OVERTIME WAGES PAID BY THE
CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR;
(IV) ANY FRINGE BENEFITS PROVIDED TO EMPLOYEES BY THE
CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR;
(V) THE JOB CLASSIFICATION OF EACH EMPLOYEE EMPLOYED
BY THE CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR; AND
(VI) ANY ADDITIONAL INFORMATION DETERMINED NECESSARY
BY THE COMMISSIONER; AND
(3) (I) THE NUMBER OF APPRENTICES WORKING FOR EACH
CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR;
(II) THE TRADE PRACTICED BY EACH APPRENTICE WORKING
FOR EACH CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR;
(III) THE CERTIFICATION STATUS OF EACH APPRENTICE
WORKING FOR EACH CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR;
(IV) CONTACT INFORMATION FOR EACH APPRENTICESHIP
PROGRAM SPONSOR;
(V) DEMOGRAPHIC DATA FOR EACH APPRENTICE WORKING FOR
EACH CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR; AND
(VI) THE DATE EACH APPRENTICE REGISTERED WITH THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR.
(B) EACH CONTRACTOR WHO IS CONTRACTED UNDER A PUBLIC WORK
CONTRACT SHALL PROVIDE THE COMMISSIONER WITH THE INFORMATION LISTED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION ONCE A WEEK.
(C) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL:
(1) UPDATE THE DATA DASHBOARD DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION AT LEAST ONCE A MONTH;
(2) POST THE MOST RECENTLY UPDATED DATA DASHBOARD
PROMINENTLY ON THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR WEBSITE; AND
(3) MAINTAIN A CACHE CONTAINING THE INFORMATION POSTED ON
THE DATA DASHBOARD FOR AT LEAST THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 24 MONTHS.

HOUSE BILL 850
(D) THE COMMISSIONER MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 7 months and, at the end of
January 31, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall
be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.